Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
In General

§ 9-13-1.
Appointment of court reporter in circuit and chancery courts.

Each circuit judge and chancellor shall appoint a competent person as shorthand reporter in his district by an entry upon the minutes of the court of an order to that effect, dated and signed by him. The said shorthand reporter shall be known as the official court reporter of said district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4235; 1906, § 4785; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3138; 1930, § 709; 1942, § 1624.

§ 9-13-3.
Oath.

Before entering into his office, the court reporter shall take, in open court, an oath that he will faithfully discharge the duties thereof; and the oath so taken shall be entered in the minutes of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4236; 1906, § 4786; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3139; 1930, § 710; 1942, § 1625.

§ 9-13-5.
Nature and term of office.

The court reporter when appointed and qualified by taking the oath required, and by filing the bond hereinafter mentioned, thereby becomes an officer of the court, and shall hold his office as court reporter for the term of four years from the date of his appointment unless sooner removed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4237; 1906, § 4787; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3140; 1930, § 711; 1942, § 1626.

§ 9-13-7.
Appointment and qualifications certified to other counties.

Copy of the writing by which the court reporter was appointed, and of the minutes relative to court reporter’s oath shall, at the cost of the court reporter, be certified by the clerk of the court in which the entries thereof are made, to the clerk of the court in each of the several counties of the district for which the court reporter was appointed, to be entered on the minutes of the court in each county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4238; 1906, § 4788; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3141; 1930, § 712; 1942, § 1627.

§ 9-13-9.
Bond.

The judge or chancellor shall require the court reporter to give bond in a penalty of not less than two thousand dollars to be approved by the court, conditioned for the faithful discharge of his duties, and such bond shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of any county in the district, who shall, at the cost of the court reporter, certify a copy thereof to the clerk of said court in each of the other counties of the district, to be filed and preserved in his office, and said copies shall be competent evidence in any proceedings. And such bond shall be recorded at length in the bond record book of the county where the original is filed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4239; 1906, § 4789; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3142; 1930, § 713; 1942, § 1628.

§ 9-13-11.
Removal from office.

The judge or chancellor may in his discretion at any time remove the court reporter from office for incompetency or neglect of duty, and may appoint a court reporter to fill the vacancy as often as such removals occur. The appointment of a successor to the court reporter shall be made, and he shall qualify in the same manner, and he shall comply with all the other requirements, as is provided in the foregoing sections of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4246; 1906, § 4796; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3149; 1930, § 714; 1942, § 1629.

§ 9-13-13.
Resignation or vacation of office.

It shall not be lawful for the court reporter to resign or vacate his office so long as any business connected therewith, upon the discharge of which he has entered, is unfinished; but after such business has been completed as required by law, he may at any time resign or vacate his office; and his resignation shall take effect from the time he notifies the judge or chancellor of the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4245; 1906, § 4795; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3148; 1930, § 715; 1942, § 1630.

§ 9-13-15.
Court reporter pro tempore; effect of appointment upon compensation of regular reporter.

If the court reporter is absent during the session of the court, the judge or chancellor may, by an order entered upon the minutes of the court, appoint a court reporter pro tempore, who shall be sworn to faithfully discharge his duties as such, and who shall perform all the duties and be liable to all the penalties and punishments described for or incident to the office of court reporter. The court reporter pro tempore shall be paid for his services by the Administrative Office of Courts, out of the salary of the regular court reporter and at the same rate as the regular court reporter for the time that the court reporter pro tempore shall act. The court which is being served by the court reporter pro tempore shall authorize his compensation by auditing and reporting the time served by the court reporter pro tempore to the Administrative Office of Courts. However, if the appointment of a court reporter pro tempore is made because of illness of the regular court reporter, the court may authorize compensation of said court reporter pro tempore from the Administrative Office of Courts without diminution of the salary of the regular court reporter, for a period not to exceed forty-five (45) days in any one (1) calendar year. The salary of the court reporter pro tempore shall be paid as provided in Section 9-13-19.

All acts of the court reporter pro tempore shall be as valid and effectual as if done by the regular court reporter; and such acts as are required to be certified and signed by the court reporter shall be certified and signed by him as court reporter pro tempore.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4244; 1906, § 4794; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3147; 1930, § 716; 1942, § 1631; Laws, 1966, ch. 349, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 38, eff July 13, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-13-17.
Additional court reporters; compensation of regular reporter when assistant reporter alone is serving.

[Repealed effective January 1, 2020]

Repealed by Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 11, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§9-13-17. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3154; 1930, § 717; 1942, § 1632; Laws, 1916, ch. 236; Laws, 1955 Ex. ch. 36; Laws, 1966, ch. 350, § 1; Laws, 1969 Ex Sess, ch. 22, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 498, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 315; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 39, eff July 13, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).]

§ 9-13-19.
Salary; annual report.

Court reporters for circuit and chancery courts may be paid an annual salary payable by the Administrative Office of Courts not to exceed Forty-nine Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($49,500.00) for court reporters with five (5) years’ experience or less; not to exceed Fifty-eight Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($58,500.00) for court reporters who have more than five (5) years’experience but less than ten (10) years; and not to exceed Sixty-four Thousand Dollars ($64,000,00) for court reporters who have ten (10) years or more experience. No amount of the increase in the maximum salary authorized by this section shall be paid from the State General Fund. The board of supervisors of any county is authorized to pay its court reporters the applicable amount of the maximum salary authorized by this section. In addition, any court reporter performing the duties of a court administrator in the same judicial district in which the person is employed as a court reporter may be paid additional compensation for performing the court administrator duties. The annual amount of the additional compensation shall be set by vote of the judges and chancellors for whom the court administrator duties are performed, with consideration given to the number of hours per month devoted by the court reporter to performing the duties of a court administrator. The additional compensation shall be submitted to the Administrative Office of Courts for approval.

The several counties in each respective court district shall transfer from the general funds of those county treasuries to the Administrative Office of Courts a proportionate amount to be paid toward the annual compensation of the court reporter, including any additional compensation paid for the performance of court administrator duties. The amount to be paid by each county shall be determined by the number of weeks in which court is held in each county in proportion to the total number of weeks court is held in the district. For purposes of this section, the term “compensation” means the gross salary plus all amounts paid for benefits, or otherwise, as a result of employment or as required by employment, but does not include transcript fees otherwise authorized to be paid by or through the counties. However, only salary earned for services rendered shall be reported and credited for retirement purposes. Amounts paid for transcript fees, benefits or otherwise, including reimbursement for travel expenses, shall not be reported or credited for retirement purposes.

For example, if there are thirty-eight (38) scheduled court weeks in a particular district, a county in which court is scheduled five (5) weeks out of the year would have to pay five-thirty-eighths (5/38) of the total annual compensation.

The salary and any additional compensation for the performance of court administrator duties shall be paid in twelve (12) installments on the last working day of each month after it has been duly authorized by the appointing judge or chancellor and an order duly placed on the minutes of the court. Each county shall transfer to the Administrative Office of Courts one-twelfth (1/12) of the amount required to be paid pursuant to subsection (2) of this section by the twentieth day of each month for the salary that is to be paid on the last working day of the month. The Administrative Office of Courts shall pay to the court reporter the total amount of salary due for that month. Any county may pay, in the discretion of the board of supervisors, by the twentieth day of January of any year, the amount due for a full twelve (12) months.

From and after October 1, 1996, all circuit and chancery court reporters will be employees of the Administrative Office of Courts.

No circuit or chancery court reporter shall be entitled to any compensation for any special or extended term of court after passage of this section.

No chancery or circuit court reporter shall practice law in the court within which he or she is the court reporter.

For all travel required in the performance of official duties, the circuit or chancery court reporter shall be paid mileage by the county in which the duties were performed at the same rate as provided for state employees in Section 25-3-41. The court reporter shall file in the office of the clerk of the court which he serves a certificate of mileage expense incurred during that term and payment of such expense to the court reporter shall be paid on allowance by the judge of such court.

HISTORY:
Codes 1892, § 4242; 1906, § 4792; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3145; 1930, § 718; 1942, § 1633; Laws, 1916, ch. 232; Laws, 1928, ch. 228; Laws, 1942, ch. 303; Laws, 1944, ch. 187; Laws, 1946, ch. 348, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1948, ch. 265, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 327, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1952, ch. 237; Laws, 1958, ch. 339; Laws, 1960, ch. 325; Laws, 1966, ch. 351, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 435, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 395, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 484, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 449; Laws, 1980, ch. 478; Laws, 1985, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 538; Laws, 1989, ch. 350, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 433, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 550, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 37; Laws, 1996, ch. 414, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 570, § 8; Laws, 2004, ch. 505, § 6; Laws, 2015, ch. 451, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 9-13-21.
Court reporter’s tax fee.

In each suit, cause or matter where (1) a plea or answer is filed, and (2) in probate or any other cause or matter wherein the court reporter actually serves, a court reporter’s tax fee of ten dollars ($10.00) shall be collected as costs, and paid into the treasury of the county in which the case is tried, as the jury tax is collected by law and paid in the circuit court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 719; 1942, § 1634; Laws, 1926, ch. 144; Laws, 1978, ch. 427, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1978).

§ 9-13-23.
Stationery furnished.

The board of supervisors of each county shall provide the court reporter with all necessary stationery used by him in the performance of his official duties in the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 736; 1906, § 797; Hemingway’s 1917, § 582; 1930, § 720; 1942, § 1635; Laws, 1896, ch. 83; Laws, 1910, ch. 111; Laws, 1926, ch. 156.

§ 9-13-25.
Duties.

The court reporter shall attend each session of the court of the district for which he was appointed, from day to day, and unless the same be waived, shall take, under the control of the judge or chancellor full and complete notes, stenographically (and may use recording machines in aid thereof) of all the oral evidence and other oral proceedings, except arguments of counsel, in each case, civil and criminal, tried therein upon an issue of facts and, in any other matter or in any other case that the judge or chancellor may especially direct. He shall carefully note the order in which the evidence, both oral and written, is introduced, and by whom it is introduced, giving the name of each witness, and identifying each deposition, exhibit made, or other item of evidence or matter of proceedings by words or figures of description, and he shall carefully note oral motions and all objections of counsel and rulings of the court made during the trial, in the order in which the same shall occur. And, upon request of any party, he shall, within the time required by the Mississippi Supreme Court Rules, or from the time of the demand, if made after the trial, neatly write out in typewriting a complete copy of his stenographic notes as taken therein or he shall neatly write out in typewriting a complete copy of all matters recorded on the recording machine with a caption showing the style of the case, its number, the court in which it was tried, and when tried, and shall affix thereto a suitable index, and shall certify, sign, and file the same in the office of the clerk of the court in which the case was tried; and he shall preserve his stenographic notes or his tape or record made by said recording machine in each case in which an appeal is taken, as a record of his office. If a party demand the writing out of the court reporter’s notes for any other than the bona fide purpose of perfecting an appeal, he shall pay the court reporter in advance Twenty-five Cents (25¢) per hundred words for the same, but such work shall not delay the preparation of records for appeals. The court reporter shall serve in all habeas corpus and other matters which are heard in vacation, by agreement or otherwise, in the county of residence of the judge or chancellor. The court is authorized to purchase recording machines for the use of the court reporter, the cost of which shall be allocated to each county in the district according to the weeks of court held in each county. Any recording machine purchased for this purpose shall be of such quality as to accurately take and preserve all notes and records herein required to be made and preserved.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4240; 1906, § 4790; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3143; 1930, § 721; 1942, § 1636; Laws, 1926, ch. 144; Laws, 1958, ch. 280, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 423, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch, 573, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 9-13-27.
Custody of exhibits.

It shall be the duty of the court reporter to deliver to the clerk of the court in which any suit may be tried, at the conclusion of the trial, all depositions, exhibits, maps or other item of evidence, or matter of proceeding, introduced in evidence during the progress of the trial, and such clerk is hereby designated the custodian of such depositions, exhibits, maps or other item of evidence, or matter of proceeding, and he shall file and identify the same and, in the event an appeal to the supreme court shall be perfected in the suit, it shall be the duty of the clerk to correctly transcribe such depositions, exhibits, or other item of evidence, or matter or proceeding, and to cause a correct copy of any map to be made and to incorporate said copies of depositions, exhibits, maps, or other item of evidence, or matter of proceeding in the record of such suit to be filed with the supreme court. Provided, however, that upon order of the trial court any original exhibit shall be forwarded to the supreme court as a part of the record.

It shall be the duty of the clerk to safely keep in his custody all of such original depositions, exhibits, maps or other item of evidence, or matter of proceeding, until the final determination of the suit, or until the time has expired in which an appeal to the supreme court may be perfected.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 722; 1942, § 1637; Laws, 1930, ch. 16.

§ 9-13-29.
Withdrawal of exhibits.

At any time prior to the expiration of the period allowed by law to perfect an appeal to the supreme court, or before the determination of the suit, any party to said suit, or any witness who may have testified therein, may, upon petition duly filed and presented to the court or presented to the trial judge thereof in vacation, and upon ten days notice to the opposite party or parties, or to one of his attorneys of record, in which notice the time and place of the presentation of the petition shall be given, obtain an order from the court or judge authorizing the clerk of the court to permit said petitioning party to withdraw from the clerk’s custody, any exhibit, map or other item of evidence, which may be the property of said party or witness, if in the opinion of the court or judge such withdrawal shall be proper. Provided, however, the party or witness requesting the withdrawal shall cause a true copy of such exhibit, map, or other item of evidence, or matter of proceeding to be made by the clerk, and such clerk shall duly certify to the correctness of the copy, and such party or witness shall pay all fees authorized by law for making such copy and for such certificate; the clerk shall be required to make the copy and certificate upon the payment of such fees. Thereafter such certified copy of said exhibit, map or other item of evidence, or matter of proceedings shall remain in custody of the clerk, and during any hearing or trial of the cause and for all other purposes the duly certified copy of such exhibit, map or item of evidence, or matter of proceeding shall be deemed and considered as the true exhibit, map, item of evidence or matter of proceeding exhibited and introduced in such suit.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 723; 1942, § 1638; Laws, 1930, ch. 16.

§ 9-13-31.
Trial; reporting the trial.

In all criminal cases, and (a) in all civil cases, and (b) matters in probate, and (c) in matters of special proceedings, wherein property or demands of as much as Fifty Dollars ($50.00) may be in issue, no party shall be required without his consent to go to trial in a circuit or chancery court unless the case is attended by a court reporter; provided, however, that the judge of any chancery court may dispense with the requirement of a court reporter in hearings on temporary support and maintenance and/or temporary child custody in domestic cases unless one (1) or both of the parties request a court reporter. And in and by means of the court reporter’s shorthand notes, it shall be competent and effectual, for the purposes of appeal and all otherwise, to make of the record every part of the proceedings arising and done during the trial, from the opening until the conclusion thereof, including motions so arising to amend the pleadings, except amendments to indictments, and the ruling of the court thereon and all other motions and steps that may occur in the trial, in addition to the oral testimony. And in such a trial, provided objections are duly made and noted, no exceptions need be taken, either for the purposes of appeal or otherwise, or if taken shall not be noted, to any ruling or decision of the court, and this provision shall include the rulings of a court on objections to testimony. If any ruling or decision of the court as to any matter arising during the trial appear in the copy of the court reporter’s notes, it shall not be necessary to take any exceptions or bill of exceptions thereto. Exceptions and bills of exception shall be necessary only when it is desired to reserve exceptions to some ruling or decision of the court which would not otherwise appear of record. No bill of exceptions need be taken to the action of the court in overruling a motion for a new trial. In all cases tried either in the circuit or chancery court in which the evidence is taken down by an official court reporter, all pleadings and all papers filed or introduced in the case, all orders of the court entered on the minutes, all instructions and a copy of the court reporter’s notes shall constitute the record and no bill of exceptions shall be necessary in order to make any of the above matters part of the record.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 736; 1906, § 797; Hemingway’s 1917, § 581; 1930, § 724; 1942, § 1639; Laws, 1896, ch. 83; Laws, 1910, ch. 111; Laws, 1989, ch. 446, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 407, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1990).

§ 9-13-32.
Trial; attorney of record or interested entity may have proceeding recorded where official court reporter is not provided.

Any attorney of record or interested entity in any cause pending in a court, including justice court, which does not provide an official court reporter, may, in the discretion of the attorney or interested entity, record or have recorded any court proceeding in the cause by mechanical means or stenographically. Any expenses incident thereto shall be borne by the party or parties represented by the entity or attorney of record. The record of the court proceeding shall be used for impeachment purposes only. An interested entity includes, but is not limited to, the victim of a crime or a property owner on whose property a crime has been committed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 317; Laws, 2017, ch. 356, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§§ 9-13-33 through 9-13-41.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§9-13-33. [Codes, 1892, § 736; 1906, § 797; Hemingway’s 1917, § 582; 1930, § 725; 1942, § 1640; Laws 1896, ch. 83; Laws, 1910, ch. 111; Laws, 1926, ch. 156; Laws, 1936, ch. 236; Laws, 1958, ch. 273; Laws, 1962, ch. 305, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1964, ch. 325, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1971, ch. 442, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 354, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 361]

§9-13-35. [Codes, 1930, § 726; Laws, 1942, § 1641; Laws, 1926, ch. 156]

§9-13-37. [Codes, 1892, § 736; 1906, § 797; Hemingway’s 1917, § 583; 1930, § 727; 1942, § 1642; Laws, 1896, ch. 83; Laws, 1910, ch. 111; Laws, 1920, ch. 145]

§9-13-39. [Codes 1892, § 736; 1906, § 797; Hemingway’s 1917, § 585; 1930, § 728; 1942, § 1643; Laws, 1896, ch. 83; Laws, 1910, ch. 111; Laws, 1920, ch. 145]

§9-13-41. [Codes, 1892, § 736; 1906, § 797; Hemingway’s 1917, § 585; 1930, § 729; 1942, § 1644; Laws, 1896, ch. 83; Laws, 1910, ch. 111; Laws, 1920, ch. 145; Laws, 1950, ch. 350]

§ 9-13-43.
Transcript as prima facie correct; use as evidence.

When a transcript has been made by the official reporter and certified to as being a correct transcript of notes, tapes or audio records of the testimony and other proceedings of the trial, the same shall be prima facie a correct statement thereof and may thereafter be introduced and read in evidence in the trial of any case in any state court of the state of Mississippi, without the necessity of further identification, provided such matter is otherwise admissible.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1636.1; Laws, 1958, ch. 280, § 2.

§ 9-13-45.
Penalty for wilful neglect of duty.

If the court reporter willfully neglects to perform any duty required of him by law, he shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and, on conviction thereof, may be fined not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisoned not more than six (6) months. Moreover, he shall be liable to a deduction from his salary at the rate of Ten Dollars ($10.00) a day for each day that he shall be in such default, which deduction shall be made by the court when it authorizes his salary to the Administrative Office of the Courts, and in addition thereto he shall be liable on his bond to the party injured for all damages which may be sustained by reason of his neglect of duty. If any court reporter shall neglect or refuse to transcribe his official notes and to file such transcript within the time and in the manner required by law, or by order of the court or judge, he shall be liable upon his bond for a penalty in the amount of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00), to be recovered by the party aggrieved thereby, whether the person aggrieved has suffered any actual damage or not.

HISTORY:
Codes 1892, § 4243; 1906, § 4793; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3146; 1930, § 730; 1942, § 1645; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 40, eff July 13, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-13-61.
Official county and family court reporter.

There shall be an official court reporter for each county and family court judge in the State of Mississippi, to be appointed by such judge, for the purpose of performing the necessary and required stenographic work of the court or division thereof over which the appointing judge is presiding, said work to be performed under the direction of such judge and in the same manner and to the same effect as is provided in the chapter on court reporting.

Except as hereinafter provided, the reporters of said courts shall receive an annual salary of not less than Twenty-four Thousand Dollars ($24,000.00) and may, at the discretion of the board of supervisors, receive a monthly salary equal to that of the reporter of the circuit court district wherein the county lies, the same to be paid monthly by the county out of its general fund.

Provided, however, that in any Class 1 county having a population in excess of fifty-six thousand (56,000) persons according to the 1970 federal decennial census, the reporter shall receive a monthly salary equal to that of the reporter of the circuit court district wherein the county or family court lies, the same to be paid monthly by the county out of its general fund.

Provided further, that in any Class 1 county bordering on the Mississippi River and which has situated therein a national military park and national military cemetery, and having a population in excess of forty-four thousand (44,000) according to the 1970 federal decennial census, the reporter shall receive a monthly salary equal to that of the reporter of the circuit court district wherein the county lies, the same to be paid monthly by the county out of its general fund.

Provided further, that in any Class 1 county bordering on the Mississippi River wherein U.S. Highways 61 and 84 intersect, and having a population in excess of thirty-seven thousand (37,000) in the 1960 federal decennial census, the reporter shall receive a monthly salary equal to that of the reporter of the circuit court district wherein the county lies, the same to be paid monthly by the county out of its general fund.

Provided further, that in addition to the foregoing compensation, all county and family court reporters shall be paid the same fees for transcript of the record on appeals as are now or hereafter paid circuit court reporters for like or similar work.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 700; 1942, § 1611; Laws, 1926, ch. 131; Laws, 1928, ch. 219; Laws, 1948, ch. 224; Laws, 1950, ch. 355; Laws, 1952, ch. 240; Laws, 1956, ch. 232; Laws, 1960, ch. 235; Laws, 1966, ch. 346, § 1; Laws, 1966 Ex sess, ch. 24 § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 333, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 311, § 3; Laws, 1970, ch. 395, § 2; Laws, 1975, ch. 385; Laws, 1977, ch. 447, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 510, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 432, § 1, eff from and after October 1, 1997.

§ 9-13-62.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1977, ch. 447, § 2, eff from and after October 1, 1977.

§9-13-62. [Code, 1942, § 1633; en Laws, 1973, ch. 484, § 1]

§ 9-13-63.
County court reporter fees as items of costs.

In all cases filed in the county court, a court reporter’s fee shall be charged as an item of cost as follows: A fee of one dollar ($1.00) shall be charged in all cases which, if there were no county court, would have been filed in the justice of the peace court; a fee of two dollars ($2.00) shall be charged in all cases appealed to the county court and a fee of three dollars ($3.00) shall be charged in all cases which, if there were no county court, would be filed in the circuit or chancery courts. All of said reporter’s fees above mentioned are to be paid into the general fund of the county; provided, however, that no jury tax shall be charged in any case unless there is an issue joined and no court reporter’s fee shall be charged unless issue has been joined in such case and testimony taken.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1611.5; Laws, 1970, ch. 395, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1970.